test/src/morphology/N-wyngo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - выʼ: # Noun 'tundra' - partial paradigm /Type 29/
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom: выʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc: вымʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen: выʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat: вындʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [выӈгана, выӈгна]
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl: выӈгад
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros: вымна
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom: выӈгʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc: выӈгʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen: выӈгʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom: вынˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc: выӈо
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen: выӈоˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat: выӈгˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [выӈгаˮна, выӈгˮна]
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl: выӈгат
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros: выӈоˮмана
     
     выʼ+N+Tra: выӈэ
     выʼ+N+Car: вынзиˮ
     выʼ+N+Equ: вындремʼ
     выʼ+N+Equ+Lat: вындревʼ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: выми
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: выл  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: вында 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: вымиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: вылиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: вындиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: вымаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: вылаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: вындоʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: выми  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: вымд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: вымда 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: вымиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: вымдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: вымдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: вымаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: вымдаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: вымдоʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: вын   
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: выни  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: вынд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: вында 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: выниʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: вындиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: вындиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: вынаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: вындаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: вындоʼ  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: выӈган
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: выӈгани  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: выӈганд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: выӈганда 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: выӈганиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: выӈгандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: выӈгандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: выӈганаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: выӈгандаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: выӈгандоʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: выӈганан   
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: выӈганани  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: выӈгананд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: выӈгананда 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: выӈгананиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: выӈганандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: выӈганандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: выӈгананаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: выӈганандаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: выӈганандоʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: выӈгадан   
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: выӈгадани  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: выӈгаданд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: выӈгаданда 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: выӈгаданиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: выӈгадандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: выӈгадандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: выӈгаданаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: выӈгадандаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: выӈгадандоʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: вымнан   
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: вымнани  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: вымнанд  
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: вымнанда 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: вымнаниʼ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: вымнандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: вымнандиʼ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: вымнанаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: вымнандаˮ
     выʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: вымнандоʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: выӈгюн  
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: выӈгюд  
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: выӈгюда 
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: выӈгюниʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: выӈгюдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: выӈгюдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: выӈгюнаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: выӈгюдаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: выӈгюдоʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: выӈгюн  
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: выӈгюд  
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: выӈгюда 
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: выӈгюниʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: выӈгюдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: выӈгюдиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: выӈгюнаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: выӈгюдаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: выӈгюдоʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: выӈгюн  
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: выӈгют  
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: выӈгюта 
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: выӈгюниʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: выӈгютиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: выӈгютиʼ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: выӈгюнаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: выӈгютаˮ
     выʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: выӈгютоʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [выӈон, выӈони] 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: выӈод   
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: выӈода  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: выӈониʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: выӈодиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: выӈодиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: выӈонаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: выӈодаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: выӈодоʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [выӈон, выӈони]   
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: выӈод   
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: выӈода  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: выӈониʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: выӈодиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: выӈодиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: выӈонаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: выӈодаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: выӈодоʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: выӈоˮн  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: выӈот   
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: выӈота  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: выӈоˮниʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: выӈотиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: выӈотиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: выӈоˮнаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: выӈотаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: выӈотоʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: выӈгаˮн 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: выӈгат 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: выӈгата 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: выӈгаˮниʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: выӈгатиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: выӈгатиʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: выӈгаˮнаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: выӈгатаˮ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: выӈгатоʼ 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: выӈгаˮнан  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: выӈгаˮнат
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: выӈгаˮната 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: выӈгаˮнаниʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: выӈгаˮнатиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: выӈгаˮнатиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: выӈгаˮнанаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: выӈгаˮнатаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: выӈгаˮнатоʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: выӈгатан 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: выӈгатат 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: выӈгатата 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: выӈгатаниʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: выӈгататиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: выӈгататиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: выӈгатанаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: выӈгататаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: выӈгататоʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: выӈоˮманан  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: выӈоˮманат  
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: выӈоˮманата 
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: выӈоˮмананиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: выӈоˮманатиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: выӈоˮманатиʼ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: выӈоˮмананаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: выӈоˮманатаˮ
     выʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: выӈоˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative  

     выʼ+N+Pred+Abs: вынд
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [вындав, вындув]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: вындар  
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [вындада, вындда] 
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [вындав, вындув]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: вындамд
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: вындамда, вындмда
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: вындан
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: вынданд
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [вынданда, вынднда]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [вындамиʼ, вындмиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: вындриʼ
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [вындадиʼ, вынддиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [вындамиʼ, вындмиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [вындамдиʼ, вындмдиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [вындамдиʼ, вындмдиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [вынданиʼ, вындниʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [вындандиʼ, вындндиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [вындандиʼ, вындндиʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: вындваˮ
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: вындраˮ
     выʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [вындадоʼ, вынддоʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: вындваˮ
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [вындамдаˮ, вындмдаˮ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [вындамдоʼ, вындмдоʼ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [вынданаˮ, вынднаˮ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [вындандаˮ, вындндаˮ]
     выʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [вындандоʼ, вындндоʼ]
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: вындмʼ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: вынд  
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: выʼ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: выниʼ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: вындиʼ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: выӈгʼ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: вымаˮ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: вындаˮ
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: выˮ  
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: вындамзь
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: вындась 
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: вынзь   
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: вынинзь
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: вындинзь
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: выӈганзь
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: вымаць 
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: вындаць 
     выʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: выць   
